Massachusetts, session 194th, H1641.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11H of chapter 12 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 9, after the word “secured”, the
following:- ; provided, however, that in an action brought under this section against a law
enforcement officer, as defined in section 1 of chapter 6E, for conduct under color of law, proof
shall not be required that the interference or attempted interference was by threats, intimidation
or coercion.
SECTION 2. Said section 11H of said chapter 12 of the General Laws, as so appearing,
is hereby further amended by striking, in lines 39-41, the words “interference by threat,
intimidation or coercion, or attempted interference by threats, intimidation or coercion,” and
inserting in place thereof the following: - interference or attempted interference.
of 2

SECTION 3. Said section 11H of said chapter 12 of the General Laws, as so appearing, ,
is hereby further amended by inserting, after subsection (b), the following subsection: -
(c) When granting a claim of immunity from civil liability in an action brought pursuant
to this section or section 11I of this chapter against a law enforcement officer, as defined in
section 1 of chapter 6E, the court shall also make a determination in writing as to whether the
conduct alleged, if proven at trial, interfered with the exercise or enjoyment by any other person
or persons of rights secured by the constitution or laws of the United States, or of rights secured
by the constitution or laws of the commonwealth.
SECTION 4. Section 11I of said chapter 12 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting, in line 8, after the word “damages.” the following: - In an action
brought under this section against a law enforcement officer, as defined in section 1 of chapter
6E, for conduct under color of law, proof shall not be required that the interference or attempted
interference was by threats, intimidation or coercion.
of 2